Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-646
Participation; restrictions.

(1) No person under nineteen years of age shall play or participate in any way in any lottery conducted pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act.

(2) A county, city, or village which authorizes the conduct of a lottery shall establish by ordinance or resolution the limitations, if any, on the playing of any lottery conducted by the county, city, or village by any member of the governing board, a governing official, or the immediate family of such member or official.

(3) No owner or officer of a lottery operator with whom the county, city, or village contracts to conduct its lottery shall play any lottery conducted by such county, city, or village. An owner or officer of an authorized sales outlet location for such county, city, or village may be prohibited from playing any lottery conducted by such county, city, or village by ordinance or resolution. No employee or agent of a county, city, village, lottery operator, or authorized sales outlet location shall play the lottery of the county, city, or village for which he or she performs work during such time as he or she is actually working at such lottery or while on duty.

(4) No person or licensee, or employee or agent thereof, shall knowingly permit an individual under nineteen years of age to play or participate in any way in any lottery conducted pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 86;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 65;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 32.